Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1747.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Rifle." A weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or 123456789101112131415161718 redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of an explosive to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.* * *"Semiautomatic assault rifle." A semiautomatic rifle that has the capacity to accept a fixed or detachable magazine containing more than five rounds of ammunition."Semiautomatic rifle." A repeating rifle that utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round and that requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.* * *Section 2. Section 6111(f)(4)(i) of Title 18 is amended, subsection (g) is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(c.1) Semiautomatic assault rifles.--No person, corporation or firm shall sell or transfer a semiautomatic assault rifle to an individual under 21 years of age.* * *(f) Application of section.--* * *(4) (i) [The] Except for an individual prohibited from purchasing or receiving a semiautomatic assault rifle under subsection (c.1), the provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to any person who presents to the seller or transferor a written statement issued by the official described in subparagraph (iii) during the ten-day period ending on the date of the most recent proposal of such 20250HB1747PN2153 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transfer or sale by the transferee or purchaser stating that the transferee or purchaser requires access to a firearm because of a threat to the life of the transferee or purchaser or any member of the household of that transferee or purchaser.* * *(g) Penalties.--* * *(1.1) Any person, licensed dealer, licensed manufacturer or licensed importer who knowingly or intentionally sells, delivers or transfers a semiautomatic assault rifle to any person, purchaser or transferee who is unqualified or ineligible to control, possess or use a semiautomatic assault rifle under this chapter commits a felony of the third degree and shall in addition be subject to revocation of the license to sell firearms for a period of three years.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1747PN2153 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718